Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 2 ADMINISTRATION
25.5-4-209. Payments by third parties - copayments by recipients - review - appeal - children's waiting list reduction fund.

Any recipient receiving benefits under this article or article 5 or 6 of this title who receives any supplemental income, available for medical purposes under rules of the state department, or who receives proceeds from sickness, accident, health, or casualty insurance shall apply the supplemental income or insurance proceeds to the cost of the benefits rendered, and the rules may require reports from providers of other payments received by them from or on behalf of recipients.

Subject to any limitations imposed by Title XIX and the requirements set forth in subsection (1)(c) of this section, a recipient must pay at the time of service a portion of the cost of any medical benefit rendered to the recipient or to the recipient's dependents pursuant to this article 4 or article 5 or 6 of this title 25.5, as determined by rules of the state department.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1)(c)(II) of this section, on and after January 1, 2018, for pharmacy and for hospital outpatient services, including urgent care centers and facilities and emergency services, the rules of the state department required by subsection (1)(b) of this section must require the recipient to pay:

For pharmacy, at least double the average amount paid by recipients in state fiscal year 2015-16; or

For hospital outpatient services, at least double the amount required to be paid as specified in the rules as of January 1, 2017.

For both pharmacy and hospital outpatient services, the amount required to be paid by the recipient shall not exceed any specified maximum dollar amount allowed by federal law or regulations as of January 1, 2017.

The state department shall evaluate options to exempt individuals who are qualified for institutional care but are instead enrolled in home- and community-based service waivers from the increased payment requirements specified in subsection (1)(c) of this section.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 26-1-114, C.R.S., the state department is authorized to take all reasonable measures to ascertain the legal liability of third parties to pay for care and services available, including the collection of sufficient information from individuals who are eligible for medical assistance to pursue claims against the third parties. The state department shall collect the information at the time of any determination or redetermination of eligibility for medical assistance. A knowing or willful failure of an individual to provide the information may result in the termination of the individual's eligibility for medical assistance.

A third party, as a condition of doing business in the state, shall:

Provide on a monthly basis to the state department or its business associate eligibility records identifying all persons covered by the third party in a manner prescribed by rule to allow the state department or its business associate to perform an analysis and determine which persons are eligible for medical assistance;

The eligibility record data elements provided by the third party shall be the minimum necessary to achieve a satisfactory data match. The third party shall provide, upon request of the state department or its business associate, additional data elements as needed to confirm eligibility matches as determined by the initial analysis, including, but not limited to, the name, address, and identifying number of the third party's plan.

Accept the state's right of recovery and the assignment to the state of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from the third party for an item or service for which payment has been made under the medical assistance plan to the extent that such service is covered by the third party;

Respond to any inquiry by the state regarding a claim for payment for any health-care item or service that is submitted not later than three years after the date of the provision of the health-care item or service; and

Agree not to deny a claim submitted by the state solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type or format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point of sale that is the basis of the claim, if:

The claim is submitted by the state within the three-year period beginning on the date that the item or service is furnished; and

Any action by the state to enforce its rights with respect to the claim is commenced within six years after the state's submission of the claim.

The remuneration of the state department for services provided or paid for;

Any record retention requirements;

Audit requirements; and

Purposes related to litigation and testimony.

The cost to a third party of providing data, including eligibility records, shall be borne by the state department.

A third party that provides data required by the state department, whether confidential or not, shall not be held liable for the provision of such data to the state department or for any use made thereof.

The state department's business associate shall not use, transfer, extract, copy, revise, or store any data required to be provided to the state department and its business associate, including the eligibility records, social security numbers, coverage, nature of coverage, period provided, or any other data elements, for purposes other than:

The state department's business associate shall destroy all data once the functions specified in subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (e) have been accomplished.

(A) The identification of persons eligible to receive medical assistance, as defined by section 25.5-1-103 (5);

(B) Cost avoidance;

A Colorado resident shall have a private right of action against the state department's business associate if the business associate negligently uses the data specified in paragraph (e) of this subsection (2) for purposes other than those stated in paragraph (e) of this subsection (2). The right of action shall be enforceable in the courts of Colorado and limited to the actual damages incurred by the individual bringing the action.

A third party may bring an action on behalf of a Colorado resident for injunctive relief against the state department's business associate to prevent the business associate from intentionally using the data for purposes other than those specified in paragraph (e) of this subsection (2).

As used in this section:

"Business associate" shall have the same meaning as provided in 45 CFR 160.103.

"Third party" means a health insurer, self-insured plan, group health plan as defined in 29 U.S.C. sec. 1167 (1), service benefit plan, managed care organization, pharmacy benefit manager, or other party that is, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health-care item or service.

The rights assigned by a recipient of medical assistance to the state department pursuant to section 25.5-4-205 (4) shall include the right to appeal an adverse coverage decision by a third party for which the medical assistance program may be responsible for payment, including but not limited to the internal and external reviews provided for in sections 10-16-113 and 10-16-113.5, C.R.S., and a third party's reasonable appeal procedure under state and federal law. The state department or the independent contractor retained pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) shall review and, if necessary, may appeal at any level an adverse coverage decision, except an adverse coverage decision relating to medicare, Title XVIII of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended.

The state department shall enter into one or more agreements with an independent contractor to pursue recoveries from third parties pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (3). Any such agreement shall provide that the independent contractor's only compensation shall be a prudent and reasonable percentage of the amount recovered on behalf of the state department as determined by the state department.

An independent contractor retained pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (3) shall maintain a contemporaneous record of the hours of services provided and any costs incurred. When the matter is resolved, the independent contractor shall provide to the state department a statement of the hours of services provided, the amount of costs incurred, the total amount of the contingent fee, and the hourly rate for the services provided. The hourly rate for the services provided shall be determined by dividing the amount of the contingent fee, less the amount of costs incurred, by the number of hours of services provided by the independent contractor. The statement required by this subparagraph (I) shall be available for inspection and copying at reasonable times at the state department.

Compliance with this paragraph (c) does not relieve a contracting attorney of any obligation or legal responsibility imposed by the Colorado rules of professional conduct or any provision of law.

Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to authorize the denial of or delay of payment to a provider by the state department or the delay or interference with the provision of services to a medical assistance recipient.

Repealed.

With respect to programs administered by the state department, the state department shall access available data from the public assistance reporting information system for the purpose of identifying persons who are receiving certain public benefits from other states. The state department shall ensure that duplicate benefits are not being paid improperly to persons identified pursuant to the public assistance reporting information system.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1826, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a), (2), and (3)(a) amended, p. 1768, § 1, effective June 2.

L. 2010:

(4) added, (SB 10-167), ch. 296, p. 1378, § 5, effective May 26; (3)(a) amended and (3)(e) added, (SB 10-002), ch. 366, p. 1727, § 4, effective June 7.

L. 2017:

(1)(b) amended and (1)(c) and (1)(d) added, (SB 17-267), ch. 267, p. 1447, § 14, effective May 30.

25.5-4-210. Purchase of health insurance for recipients.

The state department shall purchase group health insurance for a medical assistance recipient who is eligible to enroll for such coverage if enrollment of such recipient in the group plan would be cost-effective. In addition, the state department may purchase individual health insurance for a medical assistance recipient who is eligible to enroll in a health insurance plan if enrollment of such recipient would be cost-effective to this state. A determination of cost-effectiveness shall be in accordance with federal guidelines established by the secretary of the United States department of health and human services.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to the contrary, the state department, in purchasing health insurance for medical assistance recipients who are eligible to enroll for private coverage, shall not purchase such health insurance for more than two thousand individuals.

Enrollment in a group health insurance plan shall be required of recipients for whom enrollment has been determined to be cost-effective as a condition of obtaining or retaining medical assistance. A parent shall be required to enroll a dependent child recipient, but medical assistance for such child shall not be discontinued if a parent fails to enroll the child.

The state department shall pay any premium, deductible, coinsurance, or other cost-sharing obligation required under the group plan for services covered under the state medical assistance plan. In addition, the state department shall pay any premium, deductible, coinsurance, or other cost-sharing obligation required under an individual plan purchased by the state department for a medical assistance recipient pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Payment of said services shall be treated as payment for medical assistance. Coverage provided by the purchased health insurance plan shall be considered as third-party liability for the purposes of section 25.5-4-209.

Services not available to a recipient under the purchased plan shall be provided to the recipient if such services would otherwise be provided as medical assistance services pursuant to this article or article 5 or 6 of this title. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require that services provided under a group health insurance plan for medical assistance recipients shall be made available to recipients not enrolled in the plan. Enrollment in a group health insurance plan pursuant to this section shall not affect the eligibility of a recipient who otherwise qualifies for medical assistance pursuant to this article or article 5 or 6 of this title.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1828, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (SB 10-167), ch. 296, p. 1378, § 6, effective May 26.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-518.5 as it existed prior to 2006.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 10-167, see section 1 of chapter 296, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

25.5-4-211. Medicaid management information system - appropriation in annual general appropriation act - expenditure in next fiscal year.

Subject to the limitation in subsection (2) of this section, unexpended and unencumbered moneys from an appropriation in the annual general appropriation act to the state department for the medicaid management information system remain available for expenditure by the state department in the next fiscal year without further appropriation. This section applies to appropriations made by the general assembly for fiscal years beginning on and after July 1, 2013.

On or before June 30, 2014, and on or before June 30 of each year thereafter, the state department shall notify the state controller of the amount of the appropriation from the annual general appropriation act for the medicaid management information system for the current fiscal year that the state department needs to remain available for expenditure in the next fiscal year. The state department may not expend more than the amount notified under the authority granted in this section.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1281), ch. 205, p. 851, § 1, effective May 11.

L. 2017:

(3) amended, (HB 17-1060), ch. 6, p. 16, § 8, effective March 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3)(b) provided for the repeal of subsection (3), effective January 3, 2018. (See L. 2017, p. 16.)

25.5-4-212. Medicaid client correspondence improvement process - legislative declaration - definition.

The general assembly finds and declares that:

Accurate, understandable, timely, informative, and clear correspondence from the state department is critical to the life and health of medicaid recipients, and, in some cases, is a matter of life and death for our most vulnerable populations;

Unclear, confusing, and late correspondence from the state department causes an increased workload for the state, counties administering the medicaid program, and nonprofit advocacy groups assisting clients; and

Government should be a good steward of taxpayers' money, ensuring that it is spent in the most cost-effective manner.

Therefore, the general assembly finds that improving medicaid client correspondence is critical to the health and safety of medicaid clients and will reduce unnecessary confusion that requires clients to call counties and the state department or file appeals.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "client correspondence" means any communication, the purpose of which is to provide notice of an approval, denial, termination, or change to an individual's medicaid eligibility; to provide notice of the approval, denial, reduction, suspension, or termination of a medicaid benefit; or to request additional information that is relevant to determining an individual's medicaid eligibility or benefits. "Client correspondence" does not include communications regarding the state department's review of trusts or review of documents or records relating to trusts.

The state department shall improve medicaid client correspondence by ensuring that client correspondence revised or created after January 1, 2018:

Is written using person-first, plain language;

Is written in a format that includes the date of the correspondence and a client greeting;

Is consistent, using the same terms throughout to the extent practicable including commonly used program names;

Is accurately translated into the second most commonly spoken language in the state if a client indicates that this is the client's written language of preference or as required by law;

Includes a statement translated into the top fifteen languages most commonly spoken by individuals in Colorado with limited English proficiency informing an applicant or client how to seek further assistance in understanding the content of the correspondence;

Clearly conveys the purpose of the client correspondence, the action or actions being taken by the state department or its designated entity, if any, and the specific action or actions that the client must or may take in response to the correspondence;

Includes a specific description of any necessary information or documents requested from the applicant or client;

Includes contact information for client questions; and

Includes a specific and plain language explanation of the basis for the denial, reduction, suspension, or termination of the benefit if applicable.

Subject to the availability of sufficient appropriations and receipt of federal financial participation, on and after July 1, 2018, the state department shall make electronically available to a client specific and detailed information concerning the client's household composition, assets, income sources, and income amounts, if relevant to a determination for which client correspondence was issued. If implemented, the state department shall notify clients in the written correspondence of the option to access this information.

The state department is encouraged to promote the receipt of client correspondence electronically or through mobile applications for clients who choose those methods of delivery as allowed by law.

As part of its ongoing process to create and improve client correspondence, the state department may engage with experts in written communication and plain language to test client correspondence against the criteria set forth in subsection (3) of this section with a geographically diverse and representative sample of medicaid clients relevant to the client correspondence being revised. The state department shall also develop a process to review and consider feedback from stakeholders including client advocates and counties prior to implementing significant changes to correspondence.

The state department shall ensure that client correspondence that may only affect a small number of clients, but may, nonetheless, have a significant impact on the lives of those clients, is appropriately prioritized for revision.

As part of its annual presentation made to its legislative committee of reference pursuant to section 2-7-203, the state department shall present information concerning:

Its process for ongoing improvement of client correspondence;

Client correspondence revised pursuant to criteria set forth in subsection (3) of this section during the prior year and client correspondence improvements that are planned for the upcoming year; and

A description of the results of testing of new or significantly revised client correspondence pursuant to subsection (6) of this section, including a description of the stakeholder feedback.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (SB 17-121), ch. 303, p. 1651, § 1, effective August 9.

25.5-4-213. Audit of medicaid client correspondence - definition.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, "client correspondence" has the same meaning as defined in section 25.5-4-212.

During the 2020 calendar year and the 2023 calendar year, the office of the state auditor shall conduct or cause to be conducted a performance audit of client correspondence. Thereafter, the state auditor, in the exercise of his or her discretion, may conduct or cause to be conducted additional performance audits of client correspondence pursuant to this section. The audit shall include correspondence generated through the Colorado benefits management system, as well as correspondence that is not generated through the Colorado benefits management system.

The performance audit conducted pursuant to this section shall include:

A review of available data from counties, the department's customer service contract center, and from assistors within the health benefit exchange, created in article 22 of title 10, regarding customer service contacts that are related to client confusion regarding correspondence received by medicaid clients or applicants;

A review of the accuracy of client correspondence at the time it is generated;

A review of whether client correspondence satisfies the requirements of any state or federal law, rule, or regulation relating to the sufficiency of any notice;

A review of any client correspondence testing process conducted by the department and whether testing is done prior to implementing new or significantly revised client communications;

A review of the results of any client correspondence testing, including client comprehension of the intended purpose or purposes of the correspondence; and

A review of the accuracy of client income and household composition information that is communicated electronically, if applicable.

If audit findings include findings that information contained in client correspondence is inaccurate at the time the correspondence was generated, the audit shall identify, if possible, the source of the inaccurate information, which may include but is not limited to computer system or interface issues, county input error, or applicant error.

Based on the findings and conclusions identified during the performance audit conducted pursuant to this section, the office of the state auditor shall make recommendations to the state department for improving client correspondence. On or before December 30, 2020, December 30, 2023, and December 30 in any calendar year in which an audit is conducted pursuant to this section, the office of the state auditor shall submit the findings, conclusions, and recommendations from the performance audit in the form of a written report to the legislative audit committee, which shall hold a public hearing for the purposes of a review of the report. The report shall also be submitted to the joint budget committee, the public health care and human services committee of the house of representatives, the health and human services committee of the senate, and the joint technology committee, or any successor committees.

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1143), ch. 67, p. 211, § 1, effective August 9; (1) amended, (SB 17-121), ch. 303, p. 1653, § 2, effective August 9.

25.5-4-214. Feasibility study - residential and inpatient substance use disorder treatment - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1351), ch. 288, p. 1600, § 2, effective June 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2019. (See L. 2017, p. 1600.)

25.5-4-215. Study - benefits for persons on work release - repeal.

The state department shall determine whether federal authority is necessary to provide benefit coverage under the medical assistance program to people who are on work release from jail, as described in section 18-1.3-207. On or before October 1, 2023, the state department shall report the results of the assessment and analysis to the joint budget committee of the general assembly.

This section is repealed, effective June 30, 2024.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (SB 22-196), ch. 193, p. 1293, § 8, effective May 19.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 22-196, see section 1 of chapter 193, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.